Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.090

Preassignment training and testing.

(1) The director shall adopt rules establishing preassignment training and testing requirements. The director may establish, by rule, continuing education requirements for private investigators.

(2) The director shall consult with the private investigator industry and law enforcement before adopting or amending the preassignment training or continuing education requirements of this section.

[ 1995 c 277 s 27; 1991 c 328 s 9.]